Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 1 General Provisions
32-10-67.
Study, financing, construction, and operation of new projects; cooperation and assistance of Department of Transportation.

The Governor, in his discretion or upon the recommendation of the State Transportation Board, is authorized and empowered to call a joint meeting of the authority and the board for the purpose of initiating all projects which may be considered under the authority of this article. Upon the concurrence of the Governor, a majority of the board, and the authority, the board or the authority is authorized and empowered to commence the study of any given project or projects and to provide for their construction. An appropriate resolution of such joint meeting shall provide for divisions of duties and responsibilities between the authority and the board in connection with such studies. In keeping with such resolution or resolutions, the authority and the board are authorized, in the performance of their assigned duties, to expend from any sums available such sums as may be necessary for the survey and study and completion of any project or projects; and such expenditures may include those necessary for all traffic surveys, expert studies, and all other expense reasonably necessary in establishing the feasibility of any given project and in the execution of all plans, specifications, and all other things necessary for revenue bond financing and construction, including all supervision of every kind required in its completion. If such expenditures, or any part of them, shall be undertaken by the board, the board shall keep proper records which shall reflect the amounts spent on each and every project study. Upon completion of any given project or projects financed by any given revenue bond issued, so long as there shall be funds available in the hands of the authority from the issue of revenue bonds to finance such project or projects, the board may demand the reimbursement of such expenditures; however, if not reimbursed, said expenditures shall be legitimate expenses of operation of the board. The authority, upon the completion or receipt of such studies or plans and specifications or other aids, shall proceed, if such project or projects are possible, to finance, acquire rights of way, construct, and operate such projects pursuant to its purposes, powers, and duties.

Upon the concurrence of the board, the Department of Transportation shall have the right to provide maintenance and operational assistance to the authority as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this article, including but not limited to authorizing employees of the department to assist the authority in the collection of tolls on authority projects. The authority shall reimburse the department for such assistance.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 6; Code 1933, § 95A-1243, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 635, § 1.

32-10-68.
Letting of contracts by competitive bids.

All contracts of the authority for the construction of any project authorized by this article shall be let to the reliable bidder submitting the lowest sealed bid upon plans and specifications approved by the department, except as otherwise provided for projects authorized under any provisions of Code Sections 32-2-78 through 32-2-81. The procedures for letting such bids shall conform to those prescribed for the department in Code Sections 32-2-64 through 32-2-72 and 32-2-78 through 32-2-81.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 13; Code 1933, § 95A-1242, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 760, § 4/SB 183.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added “, except as otherwise provided for projects authorized under any provisions of Code Sections 32-2-78 through 32-2-81” at the end of the first sentence, and added “and 32-2-78 through 32-2-81” at the end of the second sentence.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (2017).

32-10-69.
Conveyance of real property to authority; power to acquire and expend funds for property interests.

The Governor is authorized and empowered to convey to the authority, on behalf of the state, any real property or interest therein or any rights of way owned by the state, including property or rights of way acquired in the name of the department or board, which is used at the time or may, upon completion of any action committed to the authority by this article, be used as a project. The consideration for such conveyance shall be determined by the Governor and expressed in the deed of conveyance; however, such consideration shall be nominal, the benefits flowing to the state and its citizens constituting full and adequate actual consideration, provided that in the event of the inability of the authority to issue or sell the revenue bonds required for financing the completion of any given project or projects, then, subject to the intervening rights of any innocent party, all rights, titles, and interests so conveyed shall forever revert to the department or agency from which it came.

The governing authority of any county or incorporated municipality of this state is authorized and empowered on behalf of such political subdivision to convey to the authority any real property or interest therein or any rights of way owned by such political subdivision, which is used at the time or may, upon completion of any action committed to the authority by this article, be used as a project if conveyed by a county or incorporated municipality. The consideration for such conveyance shall be determined by the governing authority of such political subdivision and expressed in the deed of conveyance. Such consideration, however, shall be nominal, the benefits flowing to the political subdivisions and its citizens constituting full and adequate actual consideration. However, nothing in this subsection shall prevent the authority from reimbursing a political subdivision, as authorized in Code Section 32-10-70.

The board or its successors and the department are empowered to acquire, in any manner now permitted to them by law, and to expend funds available to them for such acquisition, real property, interests therein, or rights of way which upon acquisition may be conveyed by the Governor as provided in this Code section to the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 7; Ga. L. 1972, p. 179, § 14; Code 1933, § 95A-1244, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 227, § 6; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 32; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-10.1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, a comma was substituted for a semicolon following “actual consideration” in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 227, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Every toll established under this Act must expire at a specified period of time, and may be extended beyond said time by approval of the State Tollway Authority.”

Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 55, part of an Act to correct errors and omissions in the Code, repealed Ga. L. 1988, p. 227, § 8, which provided for the expiration and extension of tolls, and enacted those provisions as Code Section 32-10-65.1.

32-10-70.
Transfer of real and personal property to authority by public bodies and officers.

All counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state and all public agencies and officers of the state, notwithstanding any contrary provisions of the law, are authorized and empowered to lease, lend, grant, or convey to the authority, upon its request and upon such terms and conditions as the authority and the proper officials of such counties, cities, other political subdivisions, or public agencies or officials may agree upon as reasonable and fair, and without necessity for any advertisement, order of court, or other action or formality other than the regular execution of the proper instrument, any real or personal property which may be necessary or convenient to the effectuation of the purpose of this article, including real or personal property devoted to public use.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-1244.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1091, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, a comma was inserted following “municipalities” near the beginning of this Code section.

32-10-71.
Acquisition, maintenance, and operation of tollway projects; collection of parking fees for public beaches.

The authority is authorized and empowered to acquire, maintain, repair, improve, and operate a tollway project whose status at the time of acquisition is a toll facility or which was operated as a toll facility at some point in its existence. For the purpose of earning sufficient revenue to make possible the maintenance, repair, and improvement of the acquired project, the authority is authorized to collect tolls on each and every project it acquires.

When an existing state tollway facility has been acquired from a local government by the authority or the department, and the state tollway facility provides access to an island with public beaches that are in need of maintenance, repair, or restoration, the State Road and Tollway Authority may assist the local government in the collection of a parking fee for each vehicle entering the island. The local government is authorized to set a fee on roads, streets, and parking facilities owned by the local government for such purposes and may contract with the authority to collect the fee. The department is authorized to assist the authority in the collection of the fee. The local government shall reimburse the department and the authority for any costs associated with executing the terms of the contract.

When a state highway provides access to an island with public beaches that are in need of maintenance, repair, or restoration, the Department of Transportation may, if consistent with federal law and regulations, authorize the local government to set and collect a parking fee for the purpose of providing funding for such maintenance, repair, or restoration. The department is authorized to allow the authority to collect such parking fee on the state highway system, provided that the collection point shall lie within the corporate limits of the local government setting the parking fee. The authority is authorized to contract with the local government for the collection of the fee. The local government shall reimburse the authority for any costs associated with executing the terms of the contract.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 8; Ga. L. 1972, p. 179, § 8; Code 1933, § 95A-1245.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1091, § 3; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1409, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 2-1.

32-10-72.
Authority fund for excess toll and other revenue.

All revenue in excess of all obligations of the authority of any nature, together with all unused receipts and gifts of every kind and nature whatsoever, shall be and become the authority fund. The authority, in its discretion, is charged with the duty of pledging, utilizing, or expending the authority fund for the following purposes:

Pledges to the payment of any revenue bond issue requirements, sinking or reserve funds, as may be provided for under Code Section 32-10-102;

The payment of any outstanding unpaid revenue bond obligations or administrative expenses;

The construction of all or any part of projects, the need for which is concurred in by the Governor and the board;

The most advantageous obtainable redemptions and retirements of the authority’s bonds pursuant to the prepayment redemption privileges accorded to the authority upon the various issues of bonds outstanding;

The most advantageous open market purchase of the authority’s bonds that the authority may accomplish;

Investment in such securities and in such manner as it determines to be in its best interest; and

Subject to the terms of any resolution or trust indenture authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds, the transfer of funds to the department to be used by the department for department purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 10; Ga. L. 1972, p. 179, § 17; Code 1933, § 95A-1247, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-11.

32-10-73.
Designation of moneys received pursuant to article as trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to the authority of this article, whether as proceeds from the sale of revenue bonds or as revenues, tolls, and earnings, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this article. The bondholders paying or entitled to receive the benefits of such bonds shall have a lien on all such funds until applied as provided for in any resolution or trust indenture of the authority, provided that revenue bonds issued for the use and benefit of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company, or other type of private entity shall be a limited obligation of the authority and in the event of default, the remedies of the bondholders shall be limited to the funds identified in the resolution or trust indenture and not the funds held by the authority as trust funds or otherwise.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 32; Code 1933, § 95A-1269, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 760, § 5/SB 183.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added the proviso at the end of the second sentence.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (2017).

32-10-74.
Effect of article.

This article shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 34; Code 1933, § 95A-1271, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-75.
Construction of article.

This article, being for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 35; Code 1933, § 95A-1272, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 32.

32-10-76.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 4-4/HB 930, redesignated former Code Section 32-10-76 as present Code Section 50-39-53, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 32(5)/HB 497, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, reserved the designation of this Code section, effective July 1, 2021.

32-10-77.
General Assembly approval of funding for street car projects.

No funding by issuing bonds, any other state funds, or federal funds administered by the Department of Transportation shall be allowed for streetcar projects by any state entity or authority, including, but not limited to, the Department of Transportation or the State Road and Tollway Authority, or any other subsidiary of the state, without specific prior approval by passage of a general Act by the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-10-77

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 498, § 3/SB 150.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 498, § 1/SB 150, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Community Streetcar Development and Revitalization Act.”’